Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 13b, chapter 581, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 13b. As used in this section  and section 13c [ of this 2019 Act ], chapter 581, Oregon Laws
2019:
(1) “Oil” [ has the meaning given that term in ORS 468B.300 except  that “oil” does not mean gas-
oline or any other petroleum related  product that has been processed such that it is capable of being
used as a fuel for the propulsion of a motor vehicle. ] means material identified by  the United
Nations numbers UN1267 or UN3494 or by North American number NA1270, as  in effect on
January 1, 2025.
(2) “Owner” means the person who has the ultimate control over, and the right to use or sell,
oil being shipped.
(3) “Person” means an individual, trust, firm, joint stock company, corporation, partnership, joint
venture, consortium, association, state, municipality, commission, political subdivision of a state  or
any interstate body,  any commercial entity and the federal government or any agency of the federal
government.
(4) “Tank railroad car” means a loaded or unloaded  railroad car or rolling stock designated to
transport oil as part of a single train that transports[ :] 20 or more tank  railroad cars that are
loaded with oil owned by the same owner.
[(a) 20 or more tank railroad cars in a continuous block that are loaded with oil; or ]
[(b) 35 or more tank railroad cars loaded  with oil that are spread throughout the entirety of the
rolling stock, not including the locomotive, that make up the train. ]
SECTION 2.  Section 13d, chapter 581, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 13d. (1)(a) Sections 13a [ to 13c of this 2019 Act ] and 13b, chapter 581,  Oregon Laws 2019,
are repealed on [ January 2, 2027 ] July 1, 2029 .
(b) Section 13c, chapter  581, Oregon Laws 2019, as amended by section 146, chapter 539,
Oregon Laws 2021, is repealed on July 1, 2029.
(2) Any moneys remaining in the High Hazard Train Route Oil  Spill Preparedness Fund estab-
lished under [ section 14 of this 2019 Act ] ORS 468B.435 and the Oil and Hazardous Material Trans-
portation by Rail  Action Fund established under ORS 453.394 on the date of the repeal specified in
subsection (1) of this section that were collected pursuant to sections 13a  to 13c [ of this 2019 Act ],
chapter 581, Oregon Laws 2019,  that are unexpended, unobligated and not subject to any condi-
tions shall be refunded to the payors without interest.
Enrolled House Bill 2384 (HB 2384-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 4, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2384 (HB 2384-A) Page 2